Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.010

Public disclosure commission—Established—Commissioners—Prohibited activities—Compensation, travel expenses. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) The public disclosure commission is established. The commission shall be composed of five commissioners appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The commission shall have the authority and duties as set forth in this title. All appointees shall be persons of the highest integrity and qualifications. No more than three commissioners shall have an identification with the same political party.

(2) The term of each commissioner shall be five years, which may continue until a successor is appointed, but may not exceed an additional 12 months. No commissioner is eligible for appointment to more than one full term. Any commissioner may be removed by the governor, but only upon grounds of neglect of duty or misconduct in office.

(3)(a) During a commissioner's tenure, the commissioner is prohibited from engaging in any of the following activities, either within or outside the state of Washington:

(i) Holding or campaigning for elective office;

(ii) Serving as an officer of any political party or political committee;

(iii) Permitting the commissioner's name to be used in support of or in opposition to a candidate or proposition;

(iv) Soliciting or making contributions to a candidate or in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;

(v) Participating in any way in any election campaign; or

(vi) Lobbying, employing, or assisting a lobbyist, except that a commissioner or the staff of the commission may lobby to the limited extent permitted by RCW 29B.50.090 on matters directly affecting this title.

(b) This subsection is not intended to prohibit a commissioner from participating in or supporting nonprofit or other organizations, in the commissioner's private capacity, to the extent such participation is not prohibited under (a) of this subsection.

(c) The provisions of this subsection do not relieve a commissioner of any applicable disqualification and recusal requirements.

(4) A vacancy on the commission shall be filled within 30 days of the vacancy by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and the appointee shall serve for the remaining term of the appointee's predecessor. A vacancy shall not impair the powers of the remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the commission.

(5) Three commissioners shall constitute a quorum. The commission shall elect its own chair and adopt its own rules of procedure in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6) Commissioners shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while engaged in the business of the commission as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The compensation provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created under the laws of this state.

[ 2024 c 164 s 407; 2019 c 428 s 6; 2010 c 204 s 301; 1998 c 30 s 1; 1984 c 287 s 74; 1982 c 147 s 15; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 93; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 23; 1973 c 1 s 35 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.100, 42.17.350.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112: See note following RCW 29B.60.020.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.